Louisiana, session 2026, HB136.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2554(C)(6) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2554. Certification and appointment
* * *
C.
* * *
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in the city
of Harahan, a vacant position in the police department shall be filled in the following
manner:
(a) If a vacancy cannot be filled by reinstatement or by reemployment as
provided in Subsections A and B of this Section, the board shall next certify the
names of the persons on the promotional list, in the order in which they appear
thereon, for the class in which the vacancy is to be filled.
(b) The appointing authority shall select and appoint to any vacancy to be
filled a person certified to him whose name appears on the promotional list for the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 136 ENROLLED
class for which he was tested as a person who is among the three highest in
departmental seniority.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.